Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-3] Definitions. As
used in this chapter:

"Department" means the department of
human services.

"Fiscal year" means a twelve-month
period from July 1 of a particular calendar year to June 30 of the following
calendar year, inclusive.

"Hospital" means any facility
licensed pursuant to chapter 11-93, Hawaii Administrative Rules.

"Inpatient care" means the care of
patients whose conditions require admission to a hospital.

"Net patient service revenue" means
gross revenue from inpatient and outpatient care provided to hospital patients
converted to net patient revenue utilizing data from Worksheets G-2 and G-3 of
each hospital's medicare cost report for fiscal year 2013-2014. If the
hospital is new or did not file a fiscal year medicare cost report, the
department shall obtain the hospital's net patient service revenue from the
most recent period available.

"Outpatient care" means all services
furnished by hospitals to patients who are registered as hospital outpatients.

"Private hospital" means those
non-public hospitals named in attachment A of the medicaid section 1115
demonstration waiver that were in operation in calendar year 2015 and are
currently operating or any hospitals not named in attachment A of the medicaid
section 1115 demonstration waiver that became private hospitals in calendar
year 2016 and are currently operating.

"Section 1115 waiver" means the
medicaid section 1115 demonstration waiver under which the state medicaid
program is operating. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1,
§2; am L 2014, c 123, §§1(1), 2; am L 2015, c 70, §§1(1), 2; am L 2016, c 60,
§2(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next